Nevada, session 83, AB298.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.055 Each public school, including, without limitation, each
charter school, shall : [, to the extent that money is available for that
purpose:]
1. Employ a school counselor at the school on a full-time basis.
2. Provide for a comprehensive program for school counseling
developed by a school counselor pursuant to NRS 391.293.
Sec. 2. NRS 388.1344 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.1344 1. Each school safety team established pursuant to
NRS 388.1343 must consist of the administrator of the school or his
or her designee and the following persons appointed by the
administrator:
(a) A school counselor, school psychologist or social worker ;
[if the school employs a person in such a position full-time;]
(b) At least one teacher who teaches at the school;
(c) At least one parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in
the school;
(d) A school police officer or school resource officer if the
school employs a person in such a position full-time;
(e) For a middle school, junior high school or high school, one
pupil enrolled in the school; and
(f) Any other persons appointed by the administrator.
2. The administrator of the school or his or her designee shall
serve as the chair of the school safety team.
3. The school safety team shall:
(a) Meet at least two times each year;
(b) Identify and address patterns of discrimination based on
race, bullying or cyber-bullying;
(c) Review and strengthen school policies to prevent and
address discrimination based on race, bullying or cyber-bullying;
(d) Provide information to school personnel, pupils enrolled in
the school and parents and legal guardians of pupils enrolled in the
school on methods to address bullying and cyber-bullying;
(e) To the extent practicable, work with members of the
community with expertise in cultural competency; and
(f) To the extent money is available, participate in any training
conducted by the school district or school regarding bullying and
cyber-bullying.
4. To the extent practicable, the school safety team must
consist of members who are representative of the demographic
groups identified in subsection 1 of NRS 388.1235.
-
*AB298*

– 3 –
Sec. 3. NRS 388.14553 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.14553 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school shall:
(a) Appoint a team of at least three members of the staff of each
public school, other than a charter school, that is located in the
school district or of the charter school, as applicable, including,
without limitation, a school counselor, psychologist, social worker
or a similar person [, if the school employs such a person on a full-
time basis,] and a school administrator. The team must receive
notification if the support center receives:
(1) A report through the SafeVoice Program of any
dangerous, violent or unlawful activity which is being conducted, or
is threatened to be conducted, on the property of the school, at an
activity sponsored by the school, on a school bus of the school or by
a pupil enrolled at the school; or
(2) Notification through the Handle with Care Program of a
pupil who was exposed to a traumatic event.
(b) Ensure that information concerning the SafeVoice Program,
including, without limitation, the telephone number for the hotline
established pursuant to NRS 388.1455:
(1) Appears on the back of any identification card issued to
pupils and staff at the school; and
(2) Is posted in conspicuous locations around the school,
which may include, without limitation, the front office, the cafeteria
or a school bus.
2. Upon receiving notification from the support center through
the SafeVoice Program or the Handle with Care Program, a member
of the appropriate team appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 shall take appropriate action in accordance with the
training he or she has received pursuant to NRS 388.1455 or
388.14538 to respond to the activity, threat or traumatic event, as
applicable.
3. The team appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection
1 may:
(a) Include a person appointed by the public school pursuant to
NRS 388.247 to a committee to review the plan developed for the
school pursuant to NRS 388.243.
(b) Allow another person to temporarily serve on the team if a
member of the team is unavailable.
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB298*